Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1818
Inquest; surgeons; subpoena; when authorized.

If the coroner or jury deem it necessary, for the purposes of an inquisition, to summon any surgeons, the coroner shall issue a subpoena for those preferred, the same as for any other witness.

Laws 1879, § 113, p. 384;

R.S.1913, § 5680;

C.S.1922, § 5010;

C.S.1929, § 26-1519;

R.S.1943, § 23-1818.